Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 2
CREATING HOUSING AUTHORITIES

Law reviews:

For article, "Forever is an Awfully Long Time: Affordable Housing

C

ovenants in

C

olorado (Part II)", see 48 Colo. Law. 44 (Aug.-Sept. 2019).

29-4-201. Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the "Housing Authorities Law".

Source:

L. 35:

p. 523, § 1.

CSA:

C. 82, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-1.

29-4-202. Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared:

That unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in various cities and that such unsafe or unsanitary conditions arise from overcrowding and concentration of population, the obsolete and poor condition of buildings, improper planning, excessive land coverage, lack of proper light, air, and space, unsanitary design and arrangement, lack of proper sanitary facilities, and the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes;

That in all such cities persons of low income are forced to reside in unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations; that in various cities there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations available to all the inhabitants thereof and that consequently persons of low income are forced to occupy overcrowded and congested dwelling accommodations;

That these conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals, and welfare of the citizens of the state, and impair economic values; that the aforesaid conditions also exist in certain areas surrounding such cities, and that these conditions cannot be remedied by the ordinary operations of private enterprises;

That the clearance, replanning, and reconstruction of the areas in which unsanitary or unsafe housing conditions exist and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations on such financial terms that enable persons who now live in unsafe or unsanitary dwelling accommodations or in overcrowded and congested dwelling accommodations to afford to live in safe and sanitary or uncongested dwelling accommodations, are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired;

That, in order to remedy these conditions, a housing authority with the boundaries, powers, and duties provided in this part 2 shall be established for each city and that it is in the public interest that work on such projects be instituted as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency.

The necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted in this part 2 is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 523, § 2.

CSA:

C. 82, § 30.

L. 37:

p. 667, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-2.

L. 61:

p. 420, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-2.

L. 2000:

(1)(d) amended, p. 880, § 1, effective August 2.

29-4-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" or "housing authority" means a corporate body organized in accordance with the provisions of this part 2 for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in this part 2.

"Bonds" means any bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures, or other obligations of the authority issued pursuant to this part 2.

"City" means any city or incorporated town included in the territorial boundaries of the authority.

"Commissioner" means one of the members of an authority appointed in accordance with the provisions of this part 2.

"Community facilities" means real and personal property, buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies and for educational, health, or welfare purposes, and necessary utilities when designed primarily for the benefit and use of the occupants of the dwelling accommodations.

"Contract" means any agreement of an authority with or for the benefit of an obligee, whether contained in a resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, bond, or other instrument.

"Council" means the legislative body, council, board of commissioners, board of trustees, or other body charged with governing the city.

"Federal government" means the United States, the federal emergency administrator of public works, or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States.

"Government" means the state and federal governments and any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

"Mortgage" means deeds of trust, mortgages, building and loan contracts, or other instruments conveying real or personal property as security for bonds and conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

"Obligee of the authority" or "obligee" means any bondholder, trustee for any bondholders, any lessor demising property to the authority used in connection with the project, or any assignee of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the United States when it is a party to any contract with the authority.

"Project" means all real and personal property, buildings and improvements, stores, offices, lands for farming and gardening, commercial facilities, and community facilities acquired or constructed or to be acquired or constructed pursuant to a single plan or undertaking to demolish, clear, remove, alter, or repair unsanitary or unsafe housing or to provide dwelling accommodations on financial terms within the means of persons of low income. The term "project" also applies to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair of the improvements and all other work in connection therewith. The term "project" also applies to the provision of dwelling accommodations to persons, without regard to income, as long as the project substantially benefits persons of low income as determined by an authority.

"Real property" means lands, lands under water, structures, and all easements, franchises, and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise.

"State" means the state of Colorado.

"Trust indenture" means instruments pledging the revenues of real or personal properties but not conveying such properties or conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 525, § 3.

CSA:

C. 82, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-3.

L. 61:

p. 421, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-3.

L. 2000:

(12) amended, p. 880, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

(5) and (6) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1977, § 104, effective August 5.

29-4-204. Petition for creation of authority - notice - hearing.

Any twenty-five residents of the city may file a petition with the city clerk setting forth that there is a need for an authority to function in the city. Upon the filing of such a petition, the city clerk shall give notice of the time, place, and purposes of a public hearing at which the council will determine the need for such an authority in the city. Such notice shall be given at the city's expense by publishing a notice, at least ten days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the city, or, if there is no such newspaper, by posting such a notice in at least three public places within the city at least ten days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held.

Upon the date fixed for said hearing, held upon notice as provided in this section, a full opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents and taxpayers of the city and to all other interested persons. After such a hearing, the council shall determine:

Whether unsanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in the city; or

Whether there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in the city available for all the inhabitants thereof.

In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or unsanitary, the council shall take into consideration the following: The physical condition and age of the buildings; the degree of overcrowding; the percentage of land coverage; the light and air available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations; the size and arrangement of the rooms; the sanitary facilities; and the extent to which conditions exist in such buildings which endanger life or property by fire.

If it determines that either of the conditions enumerated in subsection (2) of this section exist, the council shall adopt a resolution so finding and shall cause notice of such determination to be given to the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance who shall thereupon appoint, as provided in section 29-4-205, no more than nine commissioners to act as an authority; except that, in any city and county having a population of more than three hundred thousand, the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance shall appoint nine commissioners to act as an authority whose appointments shall be conditioned upon confirmation by the council. The number of commissioners shall be specified by the council in the resolution. A certificate signed by such commissioners shall then be filed with the division of local government in the department of local affairs and there remain of record, setting forth that a notice has been given and public hearing has been held, that the council made a determination after such hearing and that the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance has appointed them as commissioners. Upon the filing of such certificates with said division, the commissioners and their successors shall constitute a housing authority, which shall be a body corporate and politic.

The boundaries of such authority shall include the same geographical area as is then or thereafter included within the boundaries of the city which caused such authority to be created.

If the council determines after a hearing that neither of the conditions enumerated in subsection (2) of this section exist, it shall adopt a resolution denying the petition. After three months have expired from the date of the denial of such petition, subsequent petitions may be filed and new hearings and determinations made thereon.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of any bond, contract, mortgage, trust indenture, or other agreement of the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this part 2 upon proof of the filing of the aforesaid certificate. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the division of local government, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action, or proceeding and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.

If the council of any city denies any petition filed for the creation of a housing authority, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section, and the residents of such city determine that there is in fact a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations in the city, a petition may be filed with the council requesting that the question of the approval or disapproval of creating a housing authority be submitted to a vote of the registered electors of such city. If the petition, which may consist of one or more separate copies, contains the signatures and residence addresses of registered electors of such city equal in number to not less than five percent of the votes cast for governor or for president and vice-president of the United States at the last preceding general election held within such city, the council shall cause a special election to be held on the question of the creation of a housing authority. All registered electors within the city shall be eligible to vote at said election, which shall be conducted insofar as possible in accordance with the provisions of sections 29-4-604 to 29-4-607; except that the question to be voted on shall be the creation of a housing authority.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 527, § 4.

CSA:

C. 82, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-4.

L. 63:

p. 557, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-4.

L. 65:

p. 727, § 2.

L. 76:

(4) and (7) amended, p. 596, § 9, effective July 7.

L. 87:

(8) amended, p. 323, § 68, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 725, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 99:

(4) amended, p. 128, § 2, effective March 24.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 881, § 3, effective August 2.

29-4-205. Appointment of commissioners.

The authority shall consist of commissioners selected by the council in the manner provided in either subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

The council may provide that all members of the governing body of the city shall ex officio be appointed the commissioners of the authority. The terms of office of such commissioners shall be coterminous with their terms of office on the governing body. For the purposes of this subsection (2), the term "governing body" means the mayor and council, board of trustees, board of commissioners, legislative body, or other body charged with governing the city. The mayor or, if the city has no mayor, the president of the council or such other presiding officer of the council shall ex officio be chairman of the commissioners. The commissioners shall select from among their members a vice-chairman.

The council may provide that an authority shall consist of no more than nine commissioners appointed by the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance; except that the council of a city and county having a population of more than three hundred thousand may provide that such authority shall consist of nine commissioners appointed by the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance. The council may also provide that the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance shall designate the first chairman. Not more than one of such commissioners may be a city official. In the event that a city official is appointed as a commissioner of an authority, acceptance or retention of such appointment shall not be deemed a forfeiture of his or her office, or incompatible therewith, or affect his or her tenure or compensation in any way. The term of office of a commissioner of an authority who is a city official shall not be affected or curtailed by the expiration of the term of his or her city office.

The commissioners appointed under this subsection (3) shall be designated by the mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance to serve for terms that are staggered from the date of their appointment such that, to the extent possible, the terms of an equal number of commissioners end each year. Thereafter, the term of office is the number of years as set by the council by resolution, not to exceed five years in length, or, if the council has not so acted, five years. A commissioner shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified. Vacancies other than by reason of expiration of terms shall be filled for the unexpired term. A majority of the commissioners constitutes a quorum. The mayor or such other appointing authority as is otherwise provided by charter or ordinance shall file with the city clerk a certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner, and such certificate is conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of each commissioner. The authority shall select from its members a vice-chairman and a chairman when the office of the first chairman becomes vacant.

Until such time as the council takes action pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, all appointments of the commissioners appointed pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be conditioned upon confirmation by the council as required by section 29-4-204 (4). This paragraph (c) shall apply to original and successor appointments and to appointments to fill vacancies.

(3.5) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, commencing on and after August 2, 2000, as new appointments are made to authorities pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, such appointments shall be made so that not less than one commissioner of each authority shall be an individual who is directly assisted by the authority and who may, if provided in a plan of the authority, be elected by individuals directly assisted by the authority. This subsection (3.5) shall not apply to any authority with fewer than three hundred public housing units if the authority provides reasonable notice to the resident advisory board of the opportunity for not less than one individual to serve as a commissioner of the authority as provided in this subsection (3.5) and, within a reasonable time after receipt by such board of the notice, the authority is not notified of the intention of any such individual to serve as a commissioner.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties.

An authority may employ a secretary who shall be executive director, technical experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. An authority may call upon the corporation counsel or chief law officer of the city for such legal services as it may require, or it may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it deems proper.

Any council may, by resolution, change the method of appointment of commissioners after a proper notice and hearing and set a date for the changed method to become effective.

Subsequent to the appointment of nine commissioners by the mayor and their confirmation by the council pursuant to section 29-4-204 (4), any council of a city and county having a population of more than three hundred thousand may, by resolution, change the number of commissioners after a proper notice and hearing and set a date for the changed number to become effective.

The terms of office of present commissioners of authorities created under this section shall expire July 1, 1973. Prior to such date, the council shall appoint new commissioners, as provided in either subsection (2) or (3) of this section, such appointments to be effective July 1, 1973.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 530, § 5.

CSA:

C. 82, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-5.

L. 73:

p. 799, § 1.

L. 91:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 725, § 2, effective April 20; (6)(b) amended, p. 1926, § 60, effective June 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1462, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 129, § 3, effective March 24.

L. 2000:

(3.5) added, p. 881, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2016:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 16-1069), ch. 5, p. 10, § 1, effective August 10.

29-4-206. Duty of the authority and commissioners.

The authority and its commissioners are under a statutory duty to comply or to cause strict compliance with all provisions of this part 2 and the laws of the state of Colorado, and, in addition thereto, with each term, provision, and covenant in any contract, on the part of the authority to be kept or performed by the authority.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 531, § 6.

CSA:

C. 82, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-6.

29-4-207. Interested commissioners or employees.

No commissioner or employee of an authority shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any project or in any property included or planned to be included in any project, nor shall he have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any project. If any commissioner or employee of an authority owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in any project, he shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the authority, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to so disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 531, § 7.

CSA:

C. 82, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-7.

29-4-208. Removal of commissioners.

The mayor may remove a commissioner for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, but only after the commissioner has been given a copy of the charges, which may be made by the mayor against him and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

Any obligee of the authority may file with the mayor written charges that the authority is violating willfully any law of the state or any term, provision, or covenant in any contract to which the authority is a party. The mayor shall give each of the commissioners a copy of such charges and an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel and, within fifteen days after receipt of such charges, shall remove any commissioners of the authority who have been found to have acquiesced in any such willful violation.

A commissioner shall be deemed to have acquiesced in a willful violation by the authority of a law of this state or of any term, provision, or covenant contained in a contract to which the authority is a party if he has not filed a written statement with the authority of his objections to such violation prior to the filing or making of such charges.

In the event of the removal of any commissioner, the mayor shall file in the office of the city clerk a record of the proceedings together with the charges made against the commissioners and findings thereon.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 532, § 8.

CSA:

C. 82, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-8.

29-4-209. Powers of authority.

An authority shall constitute a body both corporate and politic, exercising public powers and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part 2, including the following powers in addition to others granted in this section:

To investigate living, dwelling, and housing conditions and the means and methods of improving such conditions;

To determine where unsafe, unsanitary, or substandard dwelling or housing conditions exist;

To study and make recommendations concerning the city plan in relation to the problem of clearing, replanning, and reconstruction of areas in which unsafe, unsanitary, or substandard dwelling or housing conditions exist, and the providing of dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and to cooperate with any city or regional planning agency;

To prepare, carry out, and operate projects and to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or repair of any project or any part thereof;

To grant or lend moneys or otherwise provide financing to any person, firm, corporation, the city, or a government for any project or any part thereof;

To pledge or otherwise encumber any of its moneys in support of or in connection with a project;

To establish entities controlled by the authority that may own, operate, act, invest in as a partner or other participant, or take any and all steps necessary or convenient to undertake or otherwise develop a project;

To take over by purchase, lease, or otherwise any project undertaken by any government or by the city;

To manage as agent of the city any project constructed or owned by the city;

To act as agent for the federal government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or management of a project or any part thereof;

To arrange with the city or with a government for the furnishing, planning, replanning, opening, or closing of streets, roads, roadways, alleys, or other places or facilities for the acquisition by the city or a government of property, options, or property rights, or for the furnishing of property or services in connection with a project;

To lease or rent any of the dwellings or other accommodations, or any of the lands, buildings, structures, or facilities embraced in any project, and to establish and revise the rents or charges therefor;

To enter upon any buildings or property in order to conduct investigations or to make surveys or soundings;

To purchase, lease, obtain options upon, or acquire by eminent domain, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise any property, real or personal, or any interest therein from any person, firm, corporation, the city, or a government;

To sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge any property, real or personal, or any interest therein to any person, firm, corporation, the city, or a government;

To own, hold, clear, and improve property and to insure or provide for the insurance of the property or operations of the authority against such risks as the authority may deem advisable;

To procure assurance from a government of the payment of any debts or parts thereof secured by mortgages made or held by the authority on any property included in any project;

To borrow money upon its bonds, notes, debentures, or other evidences of indebtedness, and to secure the same by pledges of its revenues and, subject to the limitations imposed by this part 2, by mortgages upon property held or to be held by it, or in any other manner:

In connection with any loan, to agree to limitations upon its right to dispose of any project or part thereof, or to undertake additional projects;

In connection with any loan by a government, to agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the authority by this part 2;

To invest any moneys held in reserve or sinking funds or any moneys not required for immediate disbursement in property or in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., or to deposit the same or any part thereof in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits as provided in this paragraph (p), the commissioners may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the authority. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the authority requires.

To sue and be sued;

To have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To have perpetual succession;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority;

To make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent with this part 2, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority;

To conduct examinations and investigations and to hear testimony and take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for its information;

To issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of books and papers and to issue commissions for the examination of witnesses who are out of the state, unable to attend before the authority, or excused from attendance;

To make available to such agencies, boards, or commissions as are charged with the duty of abating nuisances or demolishing unsafe structures within its territorial limits its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety, or welfare; and

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers given in this part 2.

Any of the investigations or examinations provided for in this part 2 may be conducted by the authority or by a committee appointed by it, consisting of one or more commissioners, or by counsel, or by an officer or employee specially authorized by the authority to conduct it. Any commissioner, counsel for the authority, or any person designated by it to conduct an investigation or examination has the power to administer oaths, take affidavits, and issue subpoenas or commissions. An authority may exercise any of the powers conferred upon it by this section, either generally or with respect to any specific project through or by any agent which it may designate, including any corporation formed under the laws of this state, and, for such purposes, an authority may cause one or more corporations to be formed under the laws of this state or may acquire the capital stock of any corporation. Any corporate agent, all of the stock of which is owned by the authority or its nominee, to the extent permitted by law, may exercise any of the powers conferred upon the authority.

In addition to all of the other powers conferred upon it by this section, an authority may do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part 2. No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by public bodies shall be applicable to an authority unless the legislature specifically so states.

Source:

L. 35:

533, § 9.

CSA:

C. 82, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-9.

L. 79:

(1)(p) amended, p. 1617, § 15, effective June 8.

L. 89:

(1)(p) amended, p. 1113, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(d.3), (1)(d.5), and (1)(d.7) added, p. 882, § 6, effective August 2.

29-4-210. Rentals and tenant selection.

In the operation or management of housing projects, any housing authority at all times shall observe the following duties with respect to rentals and tenant selection:

It may rent or lease dwelling accommodations therein only to persons of low income, being persons receiving incomes less than the incomes which, according to the determination of the authority, persons must receive to enable them to pay the rent necessary to secure safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations within the boundaries of the authority, except such dwelling accommodations as are provided by the authority or the city.

Notwithstanding the limitations of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), a housing authority may rent or lease dwelling accommodations therein to:

Persons who, by virtue of age or disability, have special housing needs or requirements that cannot reasonably be met by existing housing available within the boundaries of the authority; and

Other persons, without regard to income, in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 29-4-203 (12).

It may rent or lease the dwelling accommodations therein only at rentals within the financial reach of such persons of low income.

It may rent or lease to a tenant dwelling accommodations consisting of the number of rooms, but no greater number than that which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof without overcrowding.

It shall not accept any family as a tenant in dwelling accommodations that are provided for persons of low income if the family who would occupy the dwelling accommodations has a net annual income in excess of five times the annual rental of the dwelling accommodations to be furnished, after allowing all exemptions available to families occupying dwellings in low rent housing authorized under the act of Congress of the United States known as the "United States Housing Act of 1937", as amended. In computing such rental, for the purpose of selecting tenants, there shall be included in the rental the average annual cost to the occupant, as determined by the authority, of heat, water, electricity, gas, and other necessary services or facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is in fact included in the rental.

Nothing in this part 2 shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority:

To vest in an obligee the right, in the event of default by the authority, to take possession of a housing project or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof, free from all the restrictions imposed by this part 2 with respect to rentals, tenant selection, manner of operation, or otherwise;

To vest in obligees, pursuant to section 29-4-217, the right, in the event of default by the authority, to acquire title to a housing project or the property mortgaged by the housing authority, free from all the restrictions imposed by this part 2 except those imposed by sections 29-4-217 and 29-4-222.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 536, § 10.

CSA:

C. 82, § 38.

L. 37:

p. 669, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-10.

L. 59:

p. 488, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-10.

L. 89:

(1)(a.5) added, p. 1263, § 1, effective March 21.

L. 2000:

(1)(a.5) and (1)(d) amended, p. 882, § 7, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the "United States Housing Act of 1937", see Pub.L. 75-412, codified at 42 U.S.C. 1437 et seq.

29-4-211. Eminent domain.

The authority has the right to acquire by eminent domain any property, real or personal, which it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 2 after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use. The authority may exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of either sections 38-1-101 to 38-1-115, article 3 of title 38, and section 38-5-106 or article 6 of title 38, C.R.S.

Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired; but no property belonging to the city or to any government may be acquired without its consent, and no property belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the commission or other officer or tribunal having regulatory power over such corporation.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 537, § 11.

CSA:

C. 82, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-11.

29-4-212. Acquisition of land for government.

The authority may acquire by purchase or by the exercise of its power of eminent domain any property, real or personal, which it may deem necessary for any project being constructed or operated by a government. The authority, upon such terms and conditions as it determines, may convey title or possession of such property so acquired or purchased to such government for use in connection with such project.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 537, § 12.

CSA:

C. 82, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-12.

29-4-213. Zoning and building laws.

All projects of an authority are subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws, ordinances, and regulations applicable to the locality in which the project is situated.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 538, § 13.

CSA:

C. 82, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-13.

Cross references:

For construction requirements, see article 1 of title 9; for county planning and building codes, see article 28 of title 30; for municipal zoning restrictions, see part 3 of article 23 of title 31.

29-4-214. Types of bonds.

The authority has the power and is authorized from time to time in its discretion to issue for any of its corporate purposes:

Bonds on which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the income and revenues of the project financed with the proceeds of such bonds, or with such proceeds together with the proceeds of a grant from the federal government to aid in financing the construction thereof; or

Exclusively from the income and revenues of certain designated projects, whether or not they were financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds. The full faith and credit of the authority shall not be pledged to the payment of such bonds, but such bonds shall be payable only, and the bonds shall so state on their face, from the revenues of the designated project and the funds received from the sale or disposal thereof, and, if the authority so determines, by a trust indenture pledging such revenues, or, in certain instances as provided in this part 2 by a mortgage of the property comprising such designated project and the revenues therefrom.

Bonds for payment of the principal and interest to which the full faith and credit of the authority is pledged and for which the revenues of the authority or any part thereof may be pledged by a resolution or trust indenture of the authority; in certain instances as provided in this part 2, such bonds may be additionally secured by a mortgage on the property and revenues of the authority or any part thereof.

Neither the commissioners of the authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of the authority shall not be a debt of the state or the city and neither the state nor the city shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall they be payable out of any funds other than those of the authority.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 538, § 14.

CSA:

C. 82, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-14.

29-4-215. Form of bonds.

The bonds of the authority shall be authorized by its resolution and issued in one or more series, and they shall bear such dates; mature at such times, not exceeding sixty years from their respective dates; bear interest at such rate, payable semiannually; be in such denominations, which may be made interchangeable; be in such form, either coupon or registered; carry such registration privileges; be executed in such manner; be payable in such medium of payment, at such places; and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or its trust indenture or mortgage may provide. The bonds may be sold at public or private sale, upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine. The bonds may be sold at such price as the authority shall determine.

Pending the authorization, preparation, execution, or delivery of definite bonds, the authority may issue interim certificates or other temporary obligations to the purchaser of such bonds. Such interim certificates or other temporary obligations shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, bear such dates, and evidence such agreements relating to their discharge or payment or the delivery of definite bonds as the authority may by resolution, trust indenture, or mortgage determine.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

The authority has power, out of any funds available therefor, to purchase any bonds issued by it at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and the accrued interest. All bonds so purchased shall be canceled. This subsection (4) shall not apply to the redemption of bonds.

Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds, interim certificates, or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., pertaining to investment securities.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 539, § 15.

CSA:

C. 82, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 69-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-3-15.

L. 70:

p. 111, § 7.

L. 75:

(5) amended, p. 218, § 59, effective July 16.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1263, § 2, effective March 21.